Illinois, session 104th, SB3568.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Sections 11a-10, 11a-11, and 11a-19 and by adding Sections 61-2.15a and 1-2.15b as follows: 7    (755 ILCS 5/1-2.15a new)8    Sec. 1-2.15a. Supported decision-making. "Supported 9decision-making" has the meaning given to that term in Section 1010 of the Supported Decision-Making Agreement Act. 11    (755 ILCS 5/1-2.15b new)12    Sec. 1-2.15b. Supported decision-making agreement. 13"Supported decision-making agreement" has the meaning given to 14that term in Section 10 of the Supported Decision-Making 15Agreement Act. 16    (755 ILCS 5/11a-10)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-10)17    Sec. 11a-10. Procedures preliminary to hearing. 18    (a) Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to Section 1911a-8, the court shall set a date and place for hearing to take 20place within 30 days. The court shall appoint a guardian ad 21litem to report to the court concerning the respondent's best   SB3568- 2 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1interests consistent with the provisions of this Section, 2except that the appointment of a guardian ad litem shall not be 3required when the court determines that such appointment is 4not necessary for the protection of the respondent or a 5reasonably informed decision on the petition. If the guardian 6ad litem is not a licensed attorney, he or she shall be 7qualified, by training or experience, to work with or advocate 8for persons with developmental disabilities, the mentally ill, 9persons with physical disabilities, the elderly, or persons 10with a disability due to mental deterioration, depending on 11the type of disability that is alleged in the petition. The 12court may allow the guardian ad litem reasonable compensation. 13The guardian ad litem may consult with a person who by training 14or experience is qualified to work with persons with a 15developmental disability, persons with mental illness, persons 16with physical disabilities, or persons with a disability due 17to mental deterioration, depending on the type of disability 18that is alleged. The guardian ad litem shall personally 19observe the respondent prior to the hearing and shall inform 20him orally and in writing of the contents of the petition and 21of his rights, including providing a copy of the notice of 22rights required under subsection (e). The guardian ad litem 23shall also attempt to elicit the respondent's position 24concerning the adjudication of disability, the proposed 25guardian, a proposed change in residential placement, changes 26in care that might result from the guardianship, and other   SB3568- 3 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1areas of inquiry deemed appropriate by the court, including 2whether a supported decision-making agreement is an 3appropriate alternative to guardianship or a limited 4guardianship is an appropriate alternative to plenary 5guardianship. Notwithstanding any provision in the Mental 6Health and Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act or 7any other law, a guardian ad litem shall have the right to 8inspect and copy any medical or mental health record of the 9respondent which the guardian ad litem deems necessary, 10provided that the information so disclosed shall not be 11utilized for any other purpose nor be redisclosed except in 12connection with the proceedings. At or before the hearing, the 13guardian ad litem shall file a written report detailing his or 14her observations of the respondent, the responses of the 15respondent to any of the inquiries detailed in this Section, 16the opinion of the guardian ad litem or other professionals 17with whom the guardian ad litem consulted concerning the 18appropriateness of guardianship, and any other material issue 19discovered by the guardian ad litem, including whether a 20supported decision-making agreement is an appropriate 21alternative to guardianship or a limited guardianship is an 22appropriate alternative to plenary guardianship. The guardian 23ad litem shall appear at the hearing and testify as to any 24issues presented in his or her report.25    (b) The court (1) may appoint counsel for the respondent, 26if the court finds that the interests of the respondent will be   SB3568- 4 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1best served by the appointment, and (2) shall appoint counsel 2upon the respondent's request or if the respondent takes a 3position adverse to that of the guardian ad litem. The 4respondent shall be permitted to obtain the appointment of 5counsel either at the hearing or by any written or oral request 6communicated to the court prior to the hearing. The summons 7shall inform the respondent of this right to obtain appointed 8counsel. The court may allow counsel for the respondent 9reasonable compensation.10    (c) The allocation of guardian ad litem fees and costs is 11within the discretion of the court. No legal fees, appointed 12counsel fees, guardian ad litem fees, or costs shall be 13assessed against the Office of the State Guardian, the public 14guardian, an adult protective services agency, the Department 15of Children and Family Services, or the agency designated by 16the Governor under Section 1 of the Protection and Advocacy 17for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Act.18    (d) The hearing may be held at such convenient place as the 19court directs, including at a facility in which the respondent 20resides.21    (e) Unless he is the petitioner, the respondent shall be 22personally served with a copy of the petition and a summons not 23less than 14 days before the hearing. The summons shall be 24printed in large, bold type and shall include the following:25NOTICE OF RIGHTS OF RESPONDENT26    You have been named as a respondent in a guardianship   SB3568- 5 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1petition asking that you be declared a person with a 2disability. If the court grants the petition, a guardian will 3be appointed for you. A copy of the guardianship petition is 4attached for your convenience.5The date and time of the hearing are: 6The place where the hearing will occur is: 7The Judge's name and phone number is:8    If a guardian is appointed for you, the guardian may be 9given the right to make all important personal decisions for 10you, such as where you may live, what medical treatment you may 11receive, what places you may visit, and who may visit you. A 12guardian may also be given the right to control and manage your 13money and other property, including your home, if you own one. 14You may lose the right to make these decisions for yourself.15    You have the following legal rights:16        (1) You have the right to be present at the court 17    hearing.18        (2) You have the right to be represented by a lawyer, 19    either one that you retain, or one appointed by the Judge.20        (3) You have the right to ask for a jury of six persons 21    to hear your case.22        (4) You have the right to present evidence to the 23    court and to confront and cross-examine witnesses.24        (5) You have the right to ask the Judge to appoint an 25    independent expert to examine you and give an opinion 26    about your need for a guardian.  SB3568- 6 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1        (6) You have the right to ask that the court hearing be 2    closed to the public.3        (7) You have the right to tell the court whom you 4    prefer to have for your guardian.5        (8) You have the right to ask a judge to find that 6    although you lack some capacity to make your own 7    decisions, you can make other decisions, and therefore it 8    is best for the court to appoint only a limited guardian 9    for you. 10    You do not have to attend the court hearing if you do not 11want to be there. If you do not attend, the Judge may appoint a 12guardian if the Judge finds that a guardian would be of benefit 13to you. The hearing will not be postponed or canceled if you do 14not attend. If you are unable to attend the hearing in person 15or you will suffer harm if you attend, the Judge can decide to 16hold the hearing at a place that is convenient. The Judge can 17also follow the rule of the Supreme Court of this State, or its 18local equivalent, and decide if a video conference is 19appropriate. 20    IT IS VERY IMPORTANT THAT YOU ATTEND THE HEARING IF YOU DO 21NOT WANT A GUARDIAN OR IF YOU WANT SOMEONE OTHER THAN THE 22PERSON NAMED IN THE GUARDIANSHIP PETITION TO BE YOUR GUARDIAN. 23IF YOU DO NOT WANT A GUARDIAN OR IF YOU HAVE ANY OTHER 24PROBLEMS, YOU SHOULD CONTACT AN ATTORNEY OR COME TO COURT AND 25TELL THE JUDGE.26    Service of summons and the petition may be made by a   SB3568- 7 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1private person 18 years of age or over who is not a party to 2the action.3[END OF FORM] 4    (f) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be 5given by the petitioner by mail or in person to those persons, 6including the proposed guardian, whose names and addresses 7appear in the petition and who do not waive notice, not less 8than 14 days before the hearing. 9(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 102-191, eff. 1-1-22; 10102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 11    (755 ILCS 5/11a-11)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-11)12    Sec. 11a-11. Hearing. 13    (a) The respondent is entitled to be represented by 14counsel, to demand a jury of 6 persons, to present evidence, 15and to confront and cross-examine all witnesses. The hearing 16may be closed to the public on request of the respondent, the 17guardian ad litem, or appointed or other counsel for the 18respondent. Unless excused by the court upon a showing that 19the respondent refuses to be present or will suffer harm if 20required to attend, the respondent shall be present at the 21hearing.22    (b) (Blank).23    (c) (Blank).24    (d) In an uncontested proceeding for the appointment of a 25guardian the person who prepared the report required by   SB3568- 8 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1Section 11a-9 will only be required to testify at trial upon 2order of court for cause shown.3    (e) At the hearing the court shall inquire regarding: (1) 4the nature and extent of respondent's general intellectual and 5physical functioning; (2) the extent of the impairment of his 6adaptive behavior if he is a person with a developmental 7disability, or the nature and severity of his mental illness 8if he is a person with mental illness; (3) the understanding 9and capacity of the respondent to make and communicate 10responsible decisions concerning his person; (4) the capacity 11of the respondent to manage his estate and his financial 12affairs; (5) the appropriateness of proposed and alternate 13living arrangements; (6) the impact of the disability upon the 14respondent's functioning in the basic activities of daily 15living and the important decisions faced by the respondent or 16normally faced by adult members of the respondent's community; 17and (7) the use of a supported decision-making agreement or 18limited guardianship as an alternative to plenary 19guardianship; and (8) any other area of inquiry deemed 20appropriate by the court.21    (f) An authenticated transcript of the evidence taken in a 22judicial proceeding concerning the respondent under the Mental 23Health and Developmental Disabilities Code is admissible in 24evidence at the hearing.25    (g) If the petition is for the appointment of a guardian 26for a beneficiary of the Veterans Administration who has a   SB3568- 9 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1disability, a certificate of the Administrator of Veterans 2Affairs or his representative stating that the beneficiary has 3been determined to be incompetent by the Veterans 4Administration on examination in accordance with the laws and 5regulations governing the Veterans Administration in effect 6upon the date of the issuance of the certificate and that the 7appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the 8payment of any money due the beneficiary by the Veterans 9Administration, is admissible in evidence at the hearing.10(Source: P.A. 98-1094, eff. 1-1-15; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 11    (755 ILCS 5/11a-19)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-19)12    Sec. 11a-19. Notice of right to seek modification. At the 13time of the appointment of a guardian the court shall inform 14the ward of his right under Section 11a-20 to petition for 15termination of adjudication of disability, revocation of the 16letters of guardianship of the estate or person, or both, or 17modification of the duties of the guardian, or modification of 18an adjudication of disability using a limited guardianship or 19termination of guardianship with a supported decision-making 20agreement under the Supported Decision Making Agreement Act 21and shall give the ward a written statement explaining this 22right and the procedures for petitioning the court. The notice 23shall be in large type and shall be in a format substantially 24similar to the following:25IN THE CIRCUIT COURT OF THE ... JUDICIAL CIRCUIT OF ILLINOIS   SB3568- 10 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1... COUNTY 2IN RE THE ESTATE OF             ) 3                                ) 4.....................,          )   CASE NO. .... 5a Person with a Disability,     )  6NOTICE TO WARD OF RIGHT TO SEEK MODIFICATION  7    [Insert name] was appointed your Guardian of the Person on 8[insert date].9    [Insert name] was appointed your Guardian of the Estate on 10[insert date].11    You have the right to ask the court to dismiss this 12guardianship, to revoke the power of this guardian to act for 13you, or to modify the duties of any such guardian.14    You, or someone on your behalf, can make this request, 15even by an informal letter, a telephone call, or a visit to the 16court. You should send your letter to the court at the 17following address; [insert name of judge and mailing address 18of courthouse].19    The court may appoint a Guardian ad Litem to investigate 20and report to the court. You have the right to have a lawyer 21appointed for you, to have a hearing before the court, to have 22a jury of six persons decide the facts, to present evidence and 23tell your story, and to ask witnesses any questions in 24cross-examination.  SB3568- 11 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    Entered this.....day of.............., 20.... 2                                    .................3                                            JUDGE 4[..]    At the time of the appointment of the Guardian in this 5cause, the court informed the ward of his or her rights under 6Section 11a-20 of the Illinois Probate Act and gave the ward, 7in open court, the above-written notice explaining these 8rights and procedures.  9or  10[..]    The Clerk of the Circuit Court shall mail a copy of the 11above-written notice to the above-named person with a 12disability at the residence address set forth in the petition 13filed herein.  14Copy Mailed:................................................. 15                            ................................ 16                                Clerk of the Circuit Court 17[END OF FORM]18(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22.) 19    Section 10. The Supported Decision-Making Agreement Act is   SB3568- 12 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1amended by changing Sections 5, 10, 15, 30, 50, and 70 as 2follows: 3    (755 ILCS 9/5)4    Sec. 5. Purpose; interpretation. The purpose of this Act 5is to protect vulnerable adults from exploitation by 6recognizing recognize a less-restrictive alternative to 7guardianship for adults with intellectual and developmental 8disabilities who need support making assistance with decisions 9regarding daily living and who, with proper support, retain 10the capacity to make those decisions. Supported 11decision-making is intended to provide individuals a way to 12maintain autonomy and decision-making authority over their own 13lives by developing and maintaining voluntary supports to 14assist them in understanding, making, communicating, and 15implementing their own informed choices.16    This Act shall be administered and interpreted in 17accordance with the following principles:18        (1) All adults, including adults with disabilities and 19    older adults, are presumed competent and to have the 20    capacity to make decisions regarding their day-to-day 21    health, safety, welfare, and social and financial affairs, 22    should be able to live in the manner they choose and to 23    accept or refuse support, assistance, or protection unless 24    otherwise determined through legal proceedings as long as 25    they do not harm others and are capable of making   SB3568- 13 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    decisions about those matters.2        (2) All adults should be able to be informed about 3    and, to the best of their ability and with the supports 4    they choose, participate in decisions regarding daily 5    living and managing their affairs.6        (3) Adults use a wide range of voluntary supports to 7    help them understand, make, and communicate their own 8    decisions. These voluntary arrangements should be 9    encouraged and recognized as a valid way for people to 10    strengthen their capacity and maintain their autonomy. 11        (4) All adults should receive the most effective yet 12    least restrictive and intrusive forms of support, 13    assistance, and protection when they are unable to care 14    for themselves or manage their affairs alone. The capacity 15    of an adult should be assessed with any supports, 16    including supported decision-making, that the person is 17    using or could use. 18        (5) (4) The values, beliefs, wishes, cultural norms, 19    and traditions that the principal holds should be 20    respected.21        (6) To safeguard vulnerable persons from exploitation, 22    supported decision-making agreements must set forth the 23    specific areas for which the supporter requests support; 24    should be reviewed every 2 years; include information 25    about how to report abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an 26    adult with disabilities; allow an interested person to   SB3568- 14 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    seek suspension or revocation of a supported 2    decision-making agreement; require a supporter to attest 3    that the supporter must complete training and is not 4    ineligible to serve as a supporter; is automatically 5    terminated if a supporter becomes disqualified; contain 6    the names and signatures of 2 witnesses; and include a 7    statement that the supporter is not authorized to make a 8    decision for the principal.9        (7) Under a supported decision-making agreement:10            (A) the principal makes the decisions and retains 11        all personal rights and autonomy;12            (B) the principal chooses trusted individuals to 13        support them; and14            (C) supporters advise the principal, provide 15        information, and help them understand the implications 16        of different choices, but they do not make the 17        decision. 18(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 19    (755 ILCS 9/10)20    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:21    "Adult" means a person who is at least 18 years of age.22    "Everyday life decisions" means decisions that support 23one's existence, including, but not limited to, decisions 24regarding medical care and treatment, one's residence, work, 25finances, and social life.  SB3568- 15 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    "Interested person" means the principal's spouse, parent, 2or adult child; a governmental agency having regulatory 3authority to protect the welfare of the principal; a service 4provider as defined in the Guardianship and Advocacy Act; and 5the principal's caregiver or another person who demonstrates 6sufficient interest in the principal's welfare. 7    "Principal" means an adult who is not under plenary 8guardianship and has not otherwise been declared by a 9physician to lack decisional capacity and with intellectual or 10developmental disabilities who seeks to enter, or has entered, 11into a supported decision-making agreement with a supporter 12under this Act.13    "Supported decision-making" means a process of supporting 14and accommodating a principal to assist the principal in 15making life decisions under a supported decision-making 16agreement. 17    "Supported decision-making agreement" means an agreement 18between a principal and a supporter under this Act that 19identifies the life decisions that can be supported, which may 20include, but are not limited to, decisions related to where 21the principal wants to live, with whom the principal wants to 22live, where the principal wants to work, and the services, 23supports, or medical care the principal wants to receive 24without impeding the self-determination of the principal.25    "Supporter" means an adult who has entered into a 26supported decision-making agreement with a principal under   SB3568- 16 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1this Act.2(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 3    (755 ILCS 9/15)4    Sec. 15. Presumption of capability.5    (a) All adults are presumed to be capable of making 6decisions regarding daily living and to have capacity unless 7otherwise determined by a court. A diagnosis of mental 8illness, intellectual disability, or developmental disability, 9or neurological disorder, of itself, does not void the 10presumption of capacity.11    (b) The manner in which an adult communicates with others 12is not grounds for deciding that the adult is incapable of 13managing the affairs of the adult.14    (c) The execution of a supported decision-making agreement 15may not be used as evidence of capacity or incapacity in any 16civil or criminal proceeding; however, the existence of such 17an agreement may be entered into evidence for purposes other 18than as evidence of capacity or incapacity. The execution of a 19supported decision-making agreement and does not preclude the 20ability of the adult who has entered into a supported 21decision-making agreement to act independently of the 22agreement.23(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 24    (755 ILCS 9/30)  SB3568- 17 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    Sec. 30. Supporter duties.2    (a) Except as otherwise provided by a supported 3decision-making agreement, a supporter may:4        (1) Assist the principal in understanding information, 5    options, responsibilities, and consequences of the life 6    decisions of the principal, including those decisions 7    related to the affairs or support services of the 8    principal.9        (2) Help the principal access, obtain, and understand 10    any information that is relevant to any given life 11    decision, including a medical, psychological, financial, 12    or educational decision, or any treatment records or 13    records necessary to manage the affairs or support 14    services of the principal.15        (3) Assist the principal in finding, obtaining, making 16    appointments for, and implementing the support services or 17    plans for support services of the principal.18        (4) Help the principal monitor information about the 19    affairs or support services of the principal, including 20    keeping track of future necessary or recommended services.21        (5) Ascertain the wishes and decisions of the 22    principal in order to advocate that the wishes and 23    decisions of an individual with disabilities are 24    implemented.25    (b) A supporter shall act with the care, competence, and 26diligence ordinarily exercised by an individual in a similar   SB3568- 18 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1circumstance, with due regard to the possession of, or lack 2of, special skills or expertise.3    (c) A supporter shall complete the seek training developed 4by the Guardianship and Advocacy Commission and education 5regarding the responsibilities and limitations of the 6supporter role within 45 days of signing the consent to act as 7a supporter. The Guardianship and Advocacy Commission shall 8provide public information about this Act and the supporter 9role, responsibilities, and limitations.10    The Guardianship and Advocacy Commission shall develop 11training and education materials for both principals and 12supporters, including, but not limited to, sample agreements 13that will be posted on the website of the Commission along with 14public awareness materials.15(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 16    (755 ILCS 9/50)17    Sec. 50. Agreement instrument. 18    (a) A support decision-making agreement must be written in 19plain language and include the following:20        (1) a list of the areas in which both the principal 21    requests support and the supporter agrees to provide 22    support;23        (2) the supporter's agreement that the supporter is 24    not disqualified from acting under Section 20 of this Act;25        (3) the supporter's agreement that the supporter will   SB3568- 19 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    complete the training required by subsection (c) of 2    Section 30 of this Act;3        (4) a statement that a supporter is not authorized to 4    make a decision for the principal; and5        (5) information about how to report suspicion that an 6    adult with a disability is being abused, neglected, or 7    exploited by the supporter.8    (b) A supported decision-making agreement must be signed 9by the principal and each supporter. The principal may use 10reasonable modifications, such as assistive technology or 11physical assistant, to sign the agreement.12    (c) A supported decision-making agreement should be 13reviewed by the principal and all supporters every 2 years 14and, updated as needed, in the same manner as an initial 15supported decision-making agreement is executed. 16    (d) A supported decision-making agreement is valid if it 17substantially follows the following form:18"SUPPORTED DECISION-MAKING AGREEMENT 19Important Information for the Supporter: Duties 20    If you agree to provide support to the principal, you have 21a duty to:22        (1) act in good faith;23        (2) act within the authority granted in this 24    agreement;  SB3568- 20 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1        (3) act loyally and without self-interest; and2        (4) avoid conflicts of interest; and .3        (5) complete the training required in Section 30 of 4    the Supported Decision-Making Agreement Act.  5Appointment of Supporter 6    I, (insert principal's name), make this agreement of my 7own free will. 8    I agree and designate that the following individual is my 9supporter:10    Name: ...............................................11    Address: ............................................12    Phone Number: .......................................13    Email Address: .......................................... 14    My supporter is to help me make decisions for myself and 15may help me with making everyday life decisions relating to 16the following:17    (Yes/No)   obtaining food, clothing, and shelter.18    (Yes/No)   taking care of my physical and emotional 19health.20    (Yes/No)   managing my financial affairs.21    (Yes/No)   applying for public benefits.22    (Yes/No)   helping me find work.  SB3568- 21 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    (Yes/No)   assisting with residential services.2    (Yes/No)   helping me with school.3    (Yes/No)   helping me advocate for myself. 4    My supporter is not allowed to make decisions for me. To 5help me with my decisions, my supporter may:6        (1) help me access, collect, or obtain information 7    that is relevant to a decision, including medical, 8    psychological, financial, educational, housing, and 9    treatment records;10        (2) help me understand my options so that I can make an 11    informed decision; and12        (3) help me communicate my decision to appropriate 13    persons. 14    I want my supporter to have:15        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 16    protected health information under the Health Insurance 17    Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 is attached.18        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 19    confidential information under the Mental Health and 20    Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act is 21    attached.22        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 23    educational records under the Family Educational Rights 24    and Privacy Act of 1974 and the Illinois School Records   SB3568- 22 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1    Act is attached.2        (Yes/No)  A release allowing my supporter to see 3    substance abuse records under Confidentiality of Alcohol 4    and Drug Abuse Patient Records regulations is attached. 5    This supported decision-making agreement is effective 6immediately and will continue until (insert date) or until the 7agreement is terminated by my supporter or me or by operation 8of law.9    Signed this .... day of ........, 20....  10    (Signature of Principal)   (Printed name of principal) 11Consent of Supporter 12    I, (name of supporter), consent to act as a supporter 13under this agreement. 14    (Signature of supporter)  (Printed name of supporter)15    (Witness 1 signature)      (Printed name of witness 1)16    (Witness 2 signature)      (Printed name of witness 2) 17WARNING: PROTECTION FOR THE ADULT WITH A DISABILITY 18IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A COPY OF THIS AGREEMENT OR IS AWARE 19OF THE EXISTENCE OF THIS AGREEMENT HAS CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT   SB3568- 23 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1THE ADULT WITH A DISABILITY IS BEING ABUSED, NEGLECTED, OR 2EXPLOITED BY THE SUPPORTER, THE PERSON SHALL REPORT THE 3ALLEGED ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR EXPLOITATION TO THE ADULT 4PROTECTIVE SERVICES HOTLINE: 1-866-800-1409, 1-888-206-1327 5(TTY)." 6     This form is not intended to exclude other forms or 7agreements that identify the principal, supporter, and types 8of supports.9(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.) 10    (755 ILCS 9/70)11    Sec. 70. Term of agreement; revocation.12    (a) A supported decision-making agreement extends until 13terminated by either party or by the terms of the agreement.14    (b) A supported decision-making agreement is terminated 15if:16        (1) the Office of Inspector General or Adult 17    Protective Services substantiated an allegation of abuse 18    or neglect by the supporter; or19        (2) there is a restraining order against the supporter 20    by or on behalf of the principal; .21        (3) all supporters become disqualified from acting as 22    a supporter under Section 20 of this Act;23        (4) the principal revokes the agreement;24        (5) the supporter resigns;  SB3568- 24 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1        (6) ordered by a court; or2        (7) the agreement includes a termination date.3    (b-5) A supported decision-making agreement is suspended 4while:5        (1) the conditions of Section 15 of the Health Care 6    Surrogate Act are met;7        (2) a medical or psychological evaluation has 8    concluded the principal lacks decisional capacity but a 9    subsequent evaluation has not yet found the principal's 10    decisional capacity restored; or11        (3) the agency established in a durable power of 12    attorney has begun but not yet terminated. 13    (c) A principal may revoke his or her supported 14decision-making agreement and invalidate the supported 15decision-making agreement at any time by:16        (1) canceling or destroying the supported 17    decision-making agreement or directing another in the 18    presence of the principal to destroy the decision-making 19    agreement;20        (2) executing a statement, in writing, that is signed 21    and dated by the principal, expressing his or her intent 22    to revoke the supported decision-making agreement; or23        (3) verbally expressing the intent of the principal to 24    revoke the supported decision-making agreement in the 25    presence of 2 witnesses. 26    (d) Unless the supported decision-making agreement   SB3568- 25 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1provides a different method for the resignation of the 2supporter support, a supporter may resign by giving written 3notice to the principal.4    (d-5) A supporter must give written notice to the 5principal if the supporter becomes disqualified from acting as 6a supporter under Section 20 of this Act. 7    (e) The last signed agreement holds.8    (f) Upon the filing of a petition by an interested person, 9a court may suspend or terminate a supported decision-making 10agreement if necessary to ensure the well-being and safety of 11the principal. Proceedings under this subsection may be 12commenced in the county where the principal resides. 13(Source: P.A. 102-614, eff. 2-27-22.)  SB3568- 26 -LRB104 18227 JRC 31666 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    755 ILCS 5/1-2.15a new4    755 ILCS 5/1-2.15b new5    755 ILCS 5/11a-10from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-106    755 ILCS 5/11a-11from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-117    755 ILCS 5/11a-19from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-198    755 ILCS 9/59    755 ILCS 9/1010    755 ILCS 9/1511    755 ILCS 9/3012    755 ILCS 9/5013    755 ILCS 9/70